New Jersey, session 221, A4287.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2023, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 22 DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 75 State Subsidies and Financial Aid STATE AID 04-8030  Local Government Services............................... $12,000,000 Total State Aid appropriation, State Subsidies and Financial Aid ................. $12,000,000 State Aid: 04    Village of Ridgewood  Ridgewood Water PFAS-Related Infrastructure Improvements .................................. ($12,000,000) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.